Wisconsin, session 2025, AB753.
do enact as follows:AB753,14Section 1. 20.435 (1) (fo) of the statutes is created to read:AB753,2,2120.435 (1) (fo) Workforce investment grants. A sum sufficient for grants to 2counties for workforce investment under s. 146.621.AB753,23Section 2. 146.621 of the statutes is created to read:AB753,2,114146.621 Workforce investment grants. Each fiscal year, the department 5shall provide grants to each county to match any investments made by the county in 6the previous fiscal year in the recruitment, retention, mental health, trauma care 7and prevention, or wellness of the county’s health care, public health, child care, 8long-term care, and other care provider workforce. No grant awarded to a county 9under this section in any fiscal year may exceed an amount equal to $1.11 10multiplied by the total number of persons residing in the county, as last determined 11by the department of administration under s. 16.96.AB753,2,1212